Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1706
Construction manager, defined.

Construction manager means the legal entity which proposes to enter into a construction manager-general contractor contract pursuant to the State Park System Construction Alternatives Act.

Laws 2018, LB775, § 7.